tests/commonwords.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../jdt.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../jdt.automorf.hfst
Tests:
  Commonwords:
    э<art>: э
    эри<post>: эри
    мэрд<n>: мэрд
    хирс<n>: хирс
    эз<abl>: эз
    мугу<v>: мугу
    е<unk>: е
    кор<unk>: кор
    зугьун<unk>: зугьун
    пирэ<unk>: пирэ
    ве<unk>: ве
    Э<unk>: Э
    чугундурэ<unk>: чугундурэ
    гэндуьмэ<unk>: гэндуьмэ
    ми<unk>: ми
    Би<unk>: Би
    Эз<unk>: Эз
    в<unk>: в
    гуфдире<unk>: гуфдире
    вэсал<unk>: вэсал
